Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.120

Oath and bond of officers.

Every officer of a town before entering upon the duties of his or her office shall take and file with the county auditor his or her oath of office. The clerk, treasurer, and marshal before entering upon their respective duties shall also each execute a bond approved by the council in such penal sum as the council by ordinance may determine, conditioned for the faithful performance of his or her duties including in the same bond the duties of all offices of which he or she is made ex officio incumbent.

All bonds, when approved, shall be filed with the town clerk, except the bonds of the clerk which shall be filed with the mayor.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2057; 1986 c 167 s 19; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.120. Prior: 1890 p 199 s 145; RRS s 9166.]

NOTES:

Severability—1986 c 167: See note following RCW 29A.16.040.